Utah statutes.
58-78-401.   Grounds for denial of license -- Disciplinary proceedings.

Grounds for the division to refuse to issue a license to an applicant under this chapter, to refuse to renew the license of a licensee, to revoke, suspend, restrict, or place on probation the license of a licensee, to issue a public or private reprimand to a licensee, and to issue a cease and desist order to a licensee shall be in accordance with Section 58-1-401.

